Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2420
Designated broker; written policy; relationships.

(1) Every designated broker shall adopt a written policy which identifies and describes the relationships in which the designated broker and affiliated licensees may engage with any seller, landlord, buyer, or tenant as part of any real estate brokerage activities.

(2) A designated broker shall not be required to offer or engage in more than one of the brokerage relationships enumerated in section 76-2416.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 20.